Indiana, session 2026, HB1090.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-6-3-2.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. The attorney general may file an amicus curiae
brief only if the governor gives written approval to file the amicus
curiae brief.
SECTION 2. IC 34-33.1-1-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.40-2010,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The state, by the attorney general, with written
approval of the governor as set forth in IC 4-6-3-2.1, may file an
amicus curiae brief in any matter pending in any state court or federal
court without the consent of the parties or leave of the court. The
attorney general shall file the amicus curiae brief within the time
allowed for the party with whom the state is substantively aligned to
file the party's brief or petition. However, for good cause shown, a state
court may permit the attorney general to file a belated amicus curiae
brief. If the state court permits the filing of a belated amicus curiae
brief, the state court shall set a deadline for an opposing party to file
2026 IN 1090—LS 6343/DI 107


a reply brief.
2026 IN 1090—LS 6343/DI 107